Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3208
License; renewal; form and content; posting.

The license when issued or renewed shall be of such form and content as the secretary may prescribe, shall be posted and prominently displayed in the licensee's principal place of engaging in the private detective business in the State of Nebraska, and shall include the name of the licensee, the name or names under which the licensee is licensed to engage in the private detective business in the State of Nebraska, and the number, date of issue or reissue and expiration date of the license.

Laws 1959, c. 329, § 8, p. 1199.